Montana, session 2025, HB570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. State-funded airports -- light aircraft. (1) An airport as defined in 67-1-
101 that receives state funding in whole or in part to carry out its operations must allow a light aircraft to:
(a) land;
(b) taxi;
(c) park with tie downs for up to 7 days; and
(d) be provided with access for passengers and aircrew as defined in 67-1-101 through any
existing security fencing:
(i) in a location readily accessible to the exterior of the security fencing; and
(ii) in a location with vehicle parking for at least four vehicles.
(2) The services in subsection (1) must be provided at no cost to the owner, operator, or
passengers of a light aircraft.
(3) No additional fees associated with landing, taxiing, parking, or security may be charged to the
owner, operator, or passengers of a light aircraft unless the fees are clearly noticed and specifically agreed to in
advance of each flight.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "light aircraft" means an aircraft as defined in 67-1-101 with a
gross weight of 12,500 pounds or less and operating under Title 14, part 91, Code of Federal Regulations.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 67, chapter 1, part 1, and the provisions of Title 67, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 570

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 570.1
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 570